California statutes. Education Code
“Regional occupational program,” as used in this chapter, means a sequence of career technical or technical training programs that meet the criteria and standards of instructional programs in regional occupational centers and are conducted in a variety of physical facilities that are not necessarily situated in one single plant or site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 572, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52304.

Subsequent to completing the survey required by Section 52302 and prior to establishing a regional occupational center or program authorized by Section 52301, the appropriate governing board, boards, or county superintendent of schools, as the case may be, shall determine whether or not the survey and analysis made pursuant to Section 52302 justifies the proposed skill training, and shall further determine whether the skill training will be offered through a regional occupational center or program, or through a contract with an approved private postsecondary school pursuant to the provisions of Section 8092.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52304.1.

The governing board of each school district maintaining a high school shall annually review and assess the participation of pupils in grades 11 and 12 in regional occupational centers and programs. The governing board shall prepare an annual plan to increase the participation of these pupils unless it determines that there are no additional pupils enrolled in the district who would benefit from this participation.

The governing board shall conduct public hearings for purposes of reviewing the participation of these pupils and for the adoption of the plan required under this
 section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 101.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

52305.

A regional occupational center or regional occupational program may:

(a) Be established pursuant to Section 52301 to provide day, including Saturday and Sunday, and evening full-time and part-time career technical education programs for minors and adults, the year around.

(b) Include within its career technical training programs, the establishment and operation of a sheltered workshop.

(c) Permit the establishment and operation of business, commercial, trade, manufacturing, or construction activities as will best serve the aims and purposes of career technical education. These activities shall also permit the sale of products or services to private or public corporations or companies, or to the general public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52306.

(a) Any business, commercial, trade, manufacturing, or construction activity referred to in subdivision (c) of Section 52305 may be undertaken as part of a regional occupational center or program provided all the following conditions have been complied with:

(1) Any facility or program operated pursuant to this section shall be only for the education or training of students enrolled in a regional occupational center or program.

(2) The facility or program shall be operated on a nonprofit basis, with all revenues restricted in their use to cover instructional and operating costs.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the facility or program initially shall obtain the approval of the appropriate trade associations concerned with the activity proposed and the approval of the county labor council in the county in which the facility or program is located.

(b) An activity conducted by a regional occupational center or program, as described in subdivision (a), may be conducted without the need to apply for or obtain local business licenses or permits, nor shall the activity be subject to payment of local business taxes.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, proceeds from business activities authorized in this section may, subject to the
 approval of the governing board, be deposited in a checking account or accounts by each regional occupational center or program and disbursed for the necessary expenses of those business activities. The account shall be established by the regional occupational center or program and be in the custody of the principal or other administrative official designated by the governing board or the county superintendent of schools, as the case may be. The principal or administrative official shall be responsible for all expenditures therefrom, subject to regulations prescribed for this purpose by the governing board or the county superintendent of schools, as the case may be. An exact accounting of receipts and disbursements shall be made to the district or county accounting office within a reasonable period of time. The governing board or the county superintendent of schools, as the case may be, shall provide for an audit of these accounts on a regular basis.

(c) Attendance of students in any business, commercial, trade, manufacturing, or construction activity referred to in subdivision (c) of Section 52305, at any regional occupational center or regional occupational program, shall be credited to that facility or program for the purposes of apportionments from the State School Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 507, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

52307.

To the extent feasible, in establishing programs pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 52305, efforts shall be made to work cooperatively with sheltered workshops which are located in the area of such programs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52308.

A regional occupational center or program may lease buildings of not more than one story or equipment for a term not to exceed 10 years, subject to an extension for a period not to exceed 10 years, without complying with any other provision of this code relating to the lease of school buildings or equipment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1143, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

52309.

(a) The curriculum initially provided by a regional occupational center or regional occupational program upon commencing operation shall be subject to the approval of the department and shall comply with all requirements and standards set forth in the State Plan for Career Technical Education. The department shall approve regional occupational centers only after giving due consideration to career technical education opportunities offered by community colleges serving the same geographical area. The State Board of Education shall adopt rules
 and regulations establishing guidelines and criteria for differentiating between courses appropriate for regional occupational centers or regional occupational programs and those appropriate for high schools.

(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall prepare and distribute by April 1, 1977, and thereafter maintain, a detailed handbook for use by the local educational agencies and regional councils established pursuant to Section 8020. The handbook shall contain course approval criteria, job market study criteria, implementation plans for administrative regulations, and procedures for securing course and program approvals.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the curriculum provided by a regional occupational center or program shall not be subject to the approval of the department as to any curriculum that is certified, by resolution of the governing body of the regional
 occupational center or program, to comply with the course approval criteria set forth in the handbook described in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 55.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52310.

Credits earned from courses completed in a regional occupational center or regional occupational program may be applied toward fulfillment of requirements for a high school diploma. A governing board of a district maintaining a regional occupational center may confer a high school diploma upon any pupil who attends a regional occupational center maintained by the district full time and has satisfactorily completed the prescribed course of study of the school district of residence or the course of study prescribed by the county superintendent of schools, school district, or school districts, as the case may be, maintaining such center.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52310.5.

(a) Each regional occupational program or center shall be maintained by, and subject to the authority and control of, its governing board.

(b) The governing board of a regional occupational program or center maintained by a single school district is the governing board of the school district.

(c) The governing board of a regional occupational program or center maintained by a county superintendent of schools is
 the county board of education.

(d) The governing board of a regional occupational program or center established by two or more school districts pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, shall consist of at least one member of the governing board of each of the school districts cooperating in the regional occupational program or center, the member to be selected by the governing board of the district represented by that member.

(e) Any other cooperative agreement established after 1965 to establish a regional occupational program or center pursuant to Section 52301 shall have a governing board which shall consist of at least one member of the governing board of each of the school districts cooperating in the regional occupational program or center. Each member is to be selected by the governing board of the
 district represented by that member.

(f) The governing board of a regional occupational center maintained by either a single school district or a county is not entitled to an additional stipend merely to carry out governance of the operations of the regional occupational center or program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 40.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

52311.

Each regional occupational center shall be established at a readily accessible place selected to serve the pupils who will attend the center. The county superintendent of schools or district or districts, as the case may be, maintaining, or participating in the operation of, the center may provide necessary transportation to the pupils attending such center.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52312.

For the purposes of this chapter the county superintendent of schools, the governing board of the school district, or the governing boards of school districts establishing a regional occupational center, or regional occupational program, may acquire a site for each regional occupational center or regional occupational program maintained by him or the district, or districts, as the case may be, and may plan, construct, purchase, or lease buildings therefor, and may purchase or lease furniture, equipment, fixtures, and other personal property therefor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52313.

The county superintendent of schools or governing board of a school district or districts, as the case may be, maintaining a regional occupational center, or regional occupational program, may accept and expend grants from the federal government or from other public or private sources for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52314.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any pupil eligible to attend a high school or adult school in a school district subject to the jurisdiction of a county superintendent of schools operating a regional occupational center or regional occupational program, and who resides in a school district which by itself or in cooperation with other school districts, has not established a regional occupational center, or regional occupational program, is eligible to attend a regional occupational center or regional occupational program maintained by the county superintendent of schools. Any school district which in cooperation with other school districts maintains a regional occupational center, or regional occupational
 program, or any cooperating school districts may admit to the center, or program, any pupil, otherwise eligible, who resides in the district or in any of the cooperating districts. Any school district which by itself maintains a regional occupational center, or regional occupational program, may admit to the center, or program, any pupil, otherwise eligible, who resides in the district. No pupil, including adults under Section 52610 shall be admitted to a regional occupational center, or regional occupational program, unless the county superintendent of schools or governing board of the district or districts maintaining the center, or program, as the case may be, determines that the pupil will benefit therefrom and approves of his or her admission to the regional occupational center or regional occupational program.

(2) Adult students shall not be enrolled in regional occupational center or program courses during the school day on a high school
 campus unless specifically authorized by the policy of the governing board of the school district.

(3) A pupil may be admitted on a full-time or part-time basis, as determined by the county superintendent of schools or governing board of the school district or districts maintaining the center, or program, as the case may be.

(b) A pupil is not eligible to be admitted to a regional occupational center or program, and his or her attendance shall not be credited to a regional occupational center or program, until he or she has attained the age of 16 years, unless the pupil meets one or more of the following conditions:

(1) The pupil is enrolled in grade 11 or a higher grade.

(2) The pupil received a referral and all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The pupil is referred to a regional occupational center or program as part of a comprehensive high school plan that has been approved by a school counselor or school administrator. The approval of the pupil’s parents or guardian may be sought but is not required.

(B) The pupil’s comprehensive high school plan requires referral to a regional occupational center or program as part of a sequence of vocational courses that allows the pupil to learn a comprehensive skill occupation that culminates in earning a postsecondary vocational certificate or diploma or its equivalent.

(C) The pupil is enrolled in a school that maintains any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(3) The individualized education program of a pupil adopted pursuant to the requirements of
 Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 56300) of Part 30 prescribes occupational training for which his or her enrollment in a regional occupational center or program is deemed appropriate.

(4) The pupil is enrolled in grade 10 and has a comprehensive high school plan that has been approved by a school counselor, and the admission of that pupil will not result in the denial of admission or displacement of pupils in grades 11 and 12 that would otherwise participate in the regional occupational center or program.

(c) Each school district, county superintendent of schools, or joint powers agency that maintains a regional occupational center or regional occupational program shall submit to the department, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the Superintendent, the enrollment and average daily attendance for each grade level and the enrollment and average daily attendance for each
 exemption set forth in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 34.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

52314.5.

A regional occupational center or program established and maintained by a county superintendent of schools, school districts, or joint powers agencies pursuant to Section 52301 shall admit youths between the ages of 15 to 18 years who are eligible to attend a high school in a school district, but who have not been enrolled on a full-time or part-time basis for a period of more than three months during the regular school year, if all of the following apply:

(a) The center or program, in conjunction
 with the appropriate school district, develops a comprehensive high school plan that describes the academic and vocational instruction that will be provided to the pupil.

(b) The pupil’s parents or guardian approves the comprehensive plan in writing.

(c) The pupil enrolls in the appropriate adult school or high school courses that are needed to satisfy the comprehensive high school plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 572, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52315.

(a) A visually impaired, orthopedically impaired, or deaf person who is not enrolled in a regular high school or community college program may attend a regional occupational center or regional occupational program pursuant to the requirements described in Section 52314.5. Additional special instruction and support services shall be provided to these persons.

(b) If the Superintendent determines that there would be a duplication of effort to these impaired persons if a regional occupational center or regional occupational program provided services to them, in that other programs exist that are available to them, the Superintendent may disapprove of the curriculum to provide programs
 to these impaired persons pursuant to Section 52309.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 19, Sec. 102.   (SB 78)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

52316.

Any pupil enrolled in grade 10, 11, or 12, and who is also attending a regional occupational center or regional occupational program may be excused from attending courses in physical education by the governing board of the school district maintaining grade 10, 11, or 12, and in which the pupil is enrolled, if attendance upon such classes results in hardship because of travel time involved.

If a pupil is excused from physical education classes pursuant to this section, the minimum schoolday for him in his regular high school is 180 minutes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52317.

The governing board of any regional occupational center or program operated by a joint powers agency, a single district, or a county superintendent of schools maintaining a county regional occupational center or program, may admit to its programs or classes, on a full-time or part-time basis, any person who can benefit from the program or class, including a person who does not reside in the attendance area of the center or program, if there are openings in the program or class. For purposes of this section, an interdistrict attendance agreement shall not be required for out-of-district enrollments.

Under no
 circumstances shall any person be enrolled in a regional occupational center or program pursuant to this section in a manner which contradicts delineation of function agreements.

Notwithstanding Section 51769 of the Education Code and Section 3368 of the Labor Code, regional occupational centers or programs or school districts within the area controlled by regional occupational centers or programs offering training to pupils residing outside its attendance area, shall provide for workers’ compensation for pupils enrolled in a community classroom program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1385, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

52319.

(a) Whenever the establishment and maintenance of a regional occupational center by two or more school districts has been undertaken pursuant to an agreement entered into in accordance with the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, and the terms of the agreement so authorize, provision may be made for the issuance of bonds for construction and other capital expenditure for the regional occupational center. An election shall be called, held, and conducted in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5300) of Part 4 of Division 1 of Title 1 on the question of the approval of the issuance of such bonds. If, at the election, the requisite number of voters
 cast their ballots in favor of the issuance of bonds, the bonds shall be issued and sold in the manner provided by law for the issuance and sale of bonds of a high school district. The issuance and sale of such bonds shall be deemed to be an act of the governing board of a high school district.

(b) The total amount of bonds issued shall not exceed one-half of 1 percent of the taxable property of the area served by the regional occupational center as shown by the last equalized assessment roll of the county or counties that the center serves.

(c) Bonds issued and sold pursuant to this section shall be retired from proceeds of the tax under the provisions of Section 52317.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 19, Sec. 103.   (SB 78)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

52320.

For the purposes of receiving advances of funds from the county treasury only, a regional occupational center shall be deemed to be a school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52321.

(a) (1) Commencing in the 2009–10 fiscal year, a regional occupational center or program established and maintained by school districts or joint powers agencies pursuant to Section 52301 shall receive in annual operating funds directly from the county office of education in which it is located an amount per unit of average daily attendance equal to the revenue limit received by each of the participating school districts for each unit of average daily attendance generated in the regional occupational center or program by
 each participating school district.

(2) A regional occupational center or program established and maintained by a county superintendent of schools pursuant to Section 52301 shall receive funding pursuant to Section 2550. A county superintendent of schools shall report average daily attendance to the Superintendent for that funding.

(b) A regional occupational center or program may budget and accumulate an amount necessary to meet the cashflow needs of the regional occupational center or program known as a general reserve, and also may budget and accumulate amounts known as the designated fund balance and as the unappropriated fund balance. Alternatively, a regional occupational center or program may budget and accumulate amounts necessary to meet its long-term program needs in a separate account known as the capital outlay and equipment replacement reserve account, and this
 account shall be part of the designated fund balance. At the end of each school year, the ending balance in the regional occupational center or program account may be distributed to any of the general reserve, designated fund balance, and unappropriated fund balance accounts, provided that the combined total distributed does not exceed 15 percent of the expenditures for the current school year.

(1) The general reserve, the designated fund balance, including the capital outlay and equipment replacement reserve account, and the unappropriated fund balance shall be available for appropriation only after approval by a majority vote of the governing body of the regional occupational center or program.

(2) Funds of a regional occupational center or program shall be distributed to the capital outlay and equipment replacement reserve account only upon adoption by the governing board of a
 resolution specifying the general use to which each appropriation from the account would be put.

(c) (1) At the end of each school year, the combined ending balances of the general reserve, the designated fund balance, except the capital outlay and equipment replacement reserve account, and the unappropriated fund balance shall not exceed 15 percent of the expenditures for the current fiscal year.

(2) A regional occupational center or program may accumulate, over a period of two or more school years, an ending balance in the capital outlay and equipment replacement reserve account of more than 15 percent of the expenditures for the current fiscal year, under provisions of a resolution of the governing board pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(d) Funds placed in either the general
 reserve, the designated fund balance, including the capital outlay and equipment replacement reserve account, or the unappropriated fund balance shall be expended only for regional occupational center or program educational purposes.

(e) Commencing in the 2007–08 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall require an annual certification by school districts, county superintendents of schools, and joint powers agencies that the regional occupational center or program funds have been expended as provided in this section. The Superintendent shall withhold from the apportionment of a subsequent fiscal year, any ending fund balance in excess of 15 percent of the expenditures for the year, except those funds specifically set aside by the governing board in the capital outlay and equipment replacement reserve account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 519, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

52322.

The State Board of Education shall make provision in allocating any funds received from the federal government pursuant to Public Law 576 of the 90th Congress to include regional occupational centers and programs that comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52323.

No instruction shall be given in a regional occupational center except by a qualified teacher holding a certificate issued pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 44200) of Part 25 of Division 3 of this title.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52324.6.

(a) Any regional occupational program shall be eligible to apply for apportionments as a necessary small regional occupational program under this section if it is a regional occupational program with an annual total average daily attendance of 350 or less in the prior fiscal year, and the regional occupational program provides instructional service to a comprehensive high school or schools that have an average daily attendance in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, during the fiscal year of 350 or less. 

A
 necessary small regional occupational program may apply for a small school regional occupational program service allocation pursuant to this section for any or all of the comprehensive high schools within its boundaries that have an average daily attendance of 350 or less during the fiscal year, and at which instruction is provided by the regional occupational program. 

The county superintendents of schools shall annually certify the eligibility of a regional occupational program as a necessary small regional occupational program and annually certify the eligibility of all comprehensive high schools within the boundaries that have been selected by the necessary small regional occupational program to receive small school regional occupational program service allocations.

(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall annually allocate small school regional occupational program service funding, in
 accordance with the schedule prescribed in this subdivision, for any and all comprehensive high schools that are certified as eligible and are selected in accordance with subdivision (a). Regional occupational programs that do not certify the employment of the minimum number of full-time equivalent certificated employees at each school shall have the total small school regional occupational program service allocation for that school reduced by a pro rata amount, based on the percentage of employee service provided in comparison to the total number of regional occupational program employees required for full funding. Full-time equivalency for purposes of this subdivision shall be equal to six teaching periods of comprehensive high school. 

The small school regional occupational program service allocation shall be adjusted annually by the same percentage cost-of-living adjustment applied to other regional occupational center and program revenue limits. 

(c) (1) If a regional occupational program applies for funding under this section, the regional occupational program shall certify to the Superintendent of Public Instruction all concurrently enrolled average daily attendance generated during the previous year in each school to which small school regional occupational program service funds were allocated under subdivision (b). The average daily attendance certified under this subdivision shall be subtracted from the regional occupational program’s prior year total allowable average daily attendance, and the remainder shall become the current year allowable regional occupational program average daily attendance for all nonconcurrently enrolled students and concurrently enrolled students from schools not funded under subdivision (b). This calculation shall be completed the year a regional occupational program applies to become a necessary small regional occupational program or
 the year that the eligible regional occupational program selects any comprehensive high school defined in subdivision (a) to receive a small school regional occupational program service allocation. 

(2) In the fiscal year that an eligible regional occupational program selects to remove a certified comprehensive high school from the small school regional occupational program service allocation funding or when the comprehensive high school no longer qualifies under the provisions of subdivision (a), the superintendent shall allocate a sum equal to the average of the prior two years’ annual regional occupational program average daily attendance for the comprehensive high school multiplied by either the statewide average revenue limit per average daily attendance or the revenue limit per average daily attendance of the regional occupational program, whichever is greater, to the revenue limit of the eligible regional occupational program. 

(3) In addition, the superintendent shall raise the prior year’s annual concurrently enrolled average daily attendance for all schools not funded under subdivision (b) of the eligible small school regional occupational program an amount equal to the average of the prior two years’ annual regional occupational program average daily attendance for the comprehensive high school. This adjusted allowable average daily attendance shall be the new base upon which growth is calculated for nonconcurrently enrolled students and concurrently enrolled students from high schools not funded under subdivision (b), within an eligible regional occupational program. 

(d) Total annual apportionments for regional occupational programs that qualify for funding under this section as necessary small regional occupational programs shall be calculated in accordance with the following formula:Total small school ROP service allocations to selected comprehensive high schools of 350 or less average daily attendance pursuant to subdivision (b)+Reported allowable average daily attendance pursuant to subdivision (c) multiplied by either the statewide average ROP revenue limit or the ROP revenue limit, whichever is greater=Total annual state apportionment for a necessary small ROP(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require eligible regional occupational programs to apply for funding under this section.

(f) In fiscal years subsequent to the 1989–90 fiscal year, the prior year’s apportionment under this section shall be annually adjusted by the same cost-of-living increase provided to regional occupational programs through the standard apportionment system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 132.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

52325.

A day of attendance for pupils enrolled in a regional occupational center or program is 180 minutes of attendance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 730, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

52327.

(a) The governing board of a school district maintaining a regional occupational center may establish a bookstore on school district property for the purpose of offering for sale textbooks, workbooks, supplementary textbooks and workbooks, school supplies, stationery supplies, confectionary items, and related auxiliary school supplies and services.

(b) The governing board of the school district may establish a bookstore fund into which the proceeds derived from the operation of a regional occupational center bookstore may be transferred. Moneys in a bookstore fund shall be deposited or invested in one or more of the following ways:

(1) Deposits in a bank or banks, or other institution, whose accounts are federally insured.

(2) Investment certificates or withdrawable shares in state-chartered savings and loan associations and savings accounts of federal savings and loan associations, provided the associations are doing business in this state and have their accounts insured by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation.

(3) Purchase of United States securities pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 16430 of the Government Code.

(c) The governing board of the school district shall designate an employee or official of the school district to act as trustee for funds derived from the operation of a regional occupational center bookstore and to receive those funds in accordance with procedures established by the board.

(d) All necessary expenses, including salaries, wages and costs of capital improvements may be deducted from the revenue of a regional occupational center bookstore. Net proceeds from the operation of a regional occupational center bookstore shall be used for the general benefit of the student body as determined by the governing board of the school district. Income from a regional occupational center bookstore shall not be included in the school district funding allocation. Funds derived from the operation of a regional occupational center bookstore shall be subject to audit pursuant to Section 41020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 19, Sec. 106.   (SB 78)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

52327.5.

Each governing board establishing or maintaining a regional occupational center or program pursuant to Section 52310.5 shall meet the requirements set forth in Sections 35145, 41010, 41011, 41015, 41020, 42103, 51040, 51041, 51050, and 51056.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 242.)
-------------------------------------------

52328.

(a) Any school district, located in whole or in part in a county contiguous with the Republic of Mexico, or any county superintendent of schools of a county contiguous with the Republic of Mexico, which maintains a regional occupational center may enter into a student exchange agreement with a trade and technical training school located in the Republic of Mexico. Such student exchange agreement shall permit Mexican students to take all or part of their occupational training in the regional occupational center and shall permit United States students to take all or part of their occupational training in the Mexican trade and technical school.

(b) In computing the average daily attendance of the regional occupational center, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall include any Mexican students in attendance if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The student exchange agreement provides as nearly as practicable for the exchange of students on a one-for-one basis between the regional occupational center and the trade and technical school.

(2) The educational services provided the United States students in Mexico are at least equivalent in quality to the services provided in the regional occupational center.

(3) The student exchange agreement has been approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction prior to its operative date.

(c) No average daily attendance shall be credited to the regional occupational center for the United States students while in attendance at the Mexican trade and technical school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52329.

(a) The governing board of a school district located in a county, or the county superintendent of schools maintaining a regional occupational program in a county, any of the boundaries of which are contiguous to the State of Arizona, may enter into an agreement with a public or private educational agency located in the State of Arizona to provide to pupils living in the school district and enrolled in a regional occupational program, career technical or technical training which, due to geographical isolation, is not otherwise available to these pupils.

(b) The program of training at the public or private educational agency shall conform to the California State Plan for Career
 Technical Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 19, Sec. 107.   (SB 78)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

52330.

The governing board of any school district or the county superintendent of schools that is operating or jointly operating a regional occupational center or program may establish and maintain regional occupational center or regional occupational program classes in industrial or school facilities located outside of the school district or the jurisdiction of the county superintendent of schools, respectively, for the purpose of providing training for students enrolled in such a center or program.

The governing board of a school district or the county superintendent of schools shall notify the Superintendent of Public Instruction, prior
 to the establishment of classes pursuant to this section, of the proposed establishment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52331.

A regional occupational program or center, established pursuant to Section 52301, may contract with a community college district to provide career technical education instruction and services for students enrolled, or seeking to enroll, in a regional occupational center or program. The instruction and services shall comply with the requirements and standards for regional occupational programs and centers as set forth in the State Plan for Career Technical Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

52334.

(a) Indirect costs charged to regional occupational centers and programs may not exceed the school district or county office of education, as appropriate, prior year indirect cost rate as approved by the department.
